Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 4 Contribution Fund

47-18-60.
[Reserved] Contribution fund into which contributions, interest, and penalties shall be deposited; control of fund; payment of amounts required under the Social Security Act.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 294, § 5; Ga. L. 1972, p. 148, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1248, § 6, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1248, § 6 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2010.